District of Columbia statutes.
47-843

Historic property tax relief — Eligibility.

To be eligible for historic property tax relief, real property must be a historic building designated by the Joint Committee on Landmarks of the National Capital and, in addition, must be approved by the Mayor under § 47-844.

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1058, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 433
Jan. 3, 1975, 88 Stat. 2178, Pub. L. 93-635, § 15(d)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-843.
1973 Ed., § 47-653.